Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7,117
Act; applicability.

(1) The Step-Therapy Reform Act applies to all individual and group health insurance policies, contracts, and certificates issued by health carriers, self-funded nonfederal governmental plans, and state employee health plans offered by the State of Nebraska.

(2) The Step-Therapy Reform Act applies to any health insurance or health benefit plans delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after January 1, 2022.

Laws 2021, LB337, § 7.